Hawaii, session 2026, SB2072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the sponsorship of a Michelin Guide for restaurants across the State. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________